Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB185.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4303 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 4303. General lighting requirements.* * *(b.1) Rear lighting retrofit.--A vehicle, other than a motor carrier vehicle, with a gross vehicle weight of 14,000 pounds or less may be operated on a highway with an ornamental lamp bar or auxiliary lighting strip in combination with the stop lamps of the vehicle's rear lighting system, to which the following shall apply:(1) The ornamental lamp bar or auxiliary lighting strip shall be the same color as the vehicle's stop lamps and may contain light-emitting diode bulbs.<--123456789101112131415161718 (2) The ornamental lamp bar or auxiliary lighting strip shall be in safe operating condition and in conformance with regulations of the department.(B.1) REAR LIGHTING RETROFIT.--(1) A VEHICLE, OTHER THAN A MOTOR CARRIER VEHICLE, WITH A GROSS VEHICLE WEIGHT OF 14,000 POUNDS OR LESS MAY BE OPERATED ON A HIGHWAY WITH AN ORNAMENTAL LAMP BAR OR AUXILIARY LIGHTING STRIP IN COMBINATION WITH THE STOP LAMPS OF THE VEHICLE'S REAR LIGHTING SYSTEM, TO WHICH THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY:(I) THE ORNAMENTAL LAMP BAR OR AUXILIARY LIGHTING STRIP SHALL BE:(A) THE SAME COLOR AND SIMILAR ILLUMINATION AS THE VEHICLE'S STOP LAMPS.(B) IN SAFE OPERATING CONDITION.(C) HORIZONTALLY MOUNTED ON THE REAR OF THE VEHICLE. IF A VEHICLE IS EQUIPPED WITH A SPARE TIRE ON THE REAR EXTERIOR ON THE VEHICLE, LIGHTING EQUIPMENT THAT IS MOUNTED WITHIN THE INNER WHEEL SHALL NOT PROTRUDE OUTSIDE OF THE WHEEL AT ANY POINT, OPERATE IN COMBINATION WITH THE STOP LAMPS AND COMPLY WITH ALL REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION.(II) THE ORNAMENTAL LAMP BAR OR AUXILIARY LIGHTING STRIP MAY:(A) CONTAIN LIGHT-EMITTING DIODE BULBS.(B) OPERATE WITH A VEHICLE'S TURN SIGNAL.(III) THE ORNAMENTAL LAMP BAR OR AUXILIARY LIGHTING STRIP MAY NOT FEATURE FLASHING OR REVOLVING LIGHTS, UNLESS THE ORNAMENTAL LAMP BAR OR AUXILIARY STRIP IS USED IN CONJUNCTION WITH A VEHICLE'S TURN SIGNAL.20250SB0185PN0487 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (IV) A VEHICLE MAY NOT HAVE MORE THAN ONE ORNAMENTAL LAMP BAR OR AUXILIARY LIGHTING STRIP EQUIPPED.(2) THIS SUBSECTION SHALL NOT APPLY TO A VEHICLE WITH ORIGINAL REAR LIGHTING EQUIPMENT FROM A MANUFACTURER THAT IS CONSISTENT WITH AN ORNAMENTAL LAMP BAR OR AUXILIARY LIGHTING STRIP.(3) AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION, THE TERM "ORNAMENTAL LAMP BAR OR AUXILIARY LIGHTING STRIP" SHALL MEAN NONORIGINAL EQUIPMENT FROM A MANUFACTURER, NON-BATTERY-POWERED LIGHTING EQUIPMENT THAT IS NO LONGER THAN 60 INCHES IN LENGTH, NO WIDER THAN 2 INCHES, NO DEEPER THAN ONE INCH AND IS HORIZONTALLY MOUNTED TO THE REAR OF THE VEHICLE, UNLESS OTHERWISE SPECIFIED IN THIS SUBSECTION.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0185PN0487 - 3 - 123456789101112131415